es: Madurez del jengibre: Maduro; Viejo; Joven; Otra
sv: Mognadsgrad för ingefära: Mogen; Gammal; Ung; Övrigt
zh-CN: 姜成熟度: 成熟; 老姜; 嫩姜; 其他
hu: Gyömbér érettsége: Érett; Öreg; Zsenge; Egyéb
da: Modningsgrad for ingefær: Moden; Gammel; Ung; Andet
pt-BR: Maturidade do gengibre: Maduro; Velho; Novo; Outro
ja: 生姜の成熟: 成熟; ひね; 新生姜; その他
de: Reifegrad des Ingwers: Reif; Alt; Jung; Sonstige
nb: Ingefærmodenhet: Moden; Gammel; Ung; Annet
fr: Maturité du gingembre: Mature; Vieux; Jeune; Autre
zh-TW: 薑成熟度: 粉薑; 老薑; 嫩薑; 其他
nl: Rijpheid van gember: Rijp; Oud; Jong; Overig
el: Ωριμότητα τζίντζερ: Ώριμο; Παλιό; Νεαρό; Άλλο
cs: Zralost zázvoru: Zralý; Starý; Mladý; Ostatní
fi: Inkiväärin kypsyys: Kypsä; Vanha; Nuori; Muu
pl: Dojrzałość imbiru: Dojrzały; Stary; Młody; Inny
th: ความสุกของขิง: โตเต็มที่; แก่; อ่อน; อื่นๆ
ru: Степень зрелости имбиря: Зрелый; Старый; Молодой; Другое
lt-LT: Imbiero brandumas: Subrendęs; Senas; Jaunas; Kita
sl-SI: Zrelost ingverja: Zrelo; Staro; Mlado; Drugo
it: Maturazione dello zenzero: Maturo; Vecchio; Giovane; Altro
pt-PT: Maturidade do gengibre: Maduro; Velho; Jovem; Outro
sk-SK: Zrelosť zázvoru: Zrelý; Starý; Mladý; Iné
ro-RO: Maturitatea ghimbirului: Matur; Bătrân; Tânăr; Altele
en: Ginger maturity: Mature; Old; Young; Other
bg-BG: Степен на зрялост на джинджифила: Зрял; Стар; Млад; Друго
ko: 생강 숙성도: 다 자란; 묵은; 어린; 기타
vi: Độ chín của gừng: Đủ tuổi; Già; Non; Khác
hr-HR: Zrelost đumbira: Zreli; Stari; Mladi; Ostalo
tr: Zencefilin olgunluk seviyesi: Olgun; Yaşlı; Taze; Diğer